Utah statutes.
4-7-12.   Sale of products of agriculture -- Prima facie evidence of fraud.
The following constitutes prima facie evidence of fraud in the sale of any
product of agriculture:
(1)  any sale of a product of agriculture at less than market price by a
dealer to a person with whom the dealer has a financial interest; or
(2)  any sale out of which the dealer receives part of the sale price other
than the agreed commission or other agreed charges.
